District of Columbia statutes.
7-2531.03

Exemptions.

(a)

No firearm originally distributed to a law enforcement agency or a law enforcement officer shall provide the basis for liability under this unit.

(b)

No action may be brought pursuant to this unit by a person who can be shown by a preponderance of the evidence to have committed a self-inflicted injury or by a person injured by a firearm while committing a crime, attempting to commit a crime, engaged in criminal activity, or engaged in a delinquent act.

(c)

No action may be brought pursuant to this unit by a person who can be shown by a preponderance of the evidence to be engaged in the sale or distribution of illegal narcotics.

(d)

No action may be brought pursuant to this unit by a person who either: (1) assumed the risk of the injury that occurred; or (2) negligently contributed to the injury that occurred.

History

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-115, § 4, 39 DCR 3182

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2383.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 9-115: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-2531.01.